Montana, session 2025, HB499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 20-4-601, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-4-601. (Temporary) Grow your own grant program -- administration. (1) There is a grow your
own grant program administered by the commissioner of higher education. The purpose of the grant program is
to develop teacher pipelines aimed at serving rural and reservation school districts.
(2) (a) The grow your own grant program must involve:
(i) the opportunity for students to take dual credit courses in education while in high school;
(ii) the opportunity for students to engage in work-based learning opportunities in the field of
education; and
(iii) collaboration between school districts and institutions of higher education in developing a
career pathway for education.
(b) The grant program must allow and encourage small and proximate districts to collaborate in
developing their grow your own grant programs.
(c) A school district is eligible for the program if the district has one or more schools impacted by a
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 499
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 499
quality educator shortage.
(d) A school district that is A postsecondary institution is eligible for a grant under this section may
be awarded a grant for up to 2 years to develop a grow your own grant program.
(3) Contingent on appropriation by the legislature, the commissioner shall create and administer:
(a) a grant program for eligible school districts eligible postsecondary institutions, in partnership
with at least one eligible school district, to develop or expand a grow your own grant program that encourages
students to pursue a career in teaching; and
(b) a grant program for tribal colleges, community colleges, and 2-year campuses to:
(i) pursue accreditation for teacher preparation programs in the specific licensure or endorsement
areas that are most impacted by quality educator shortages; or
(ii) develop collaborative programs with 4-year institutions with accredited teacher preparation
programs in the specific licensure or endorsement areas that are most impacted by quality educator shortages,
with an emphasis on collaborative programs that can be conducted in a manner that does not require residency
at the 4-year institution; and
(c)(b) a grow your own grant scholarship program that provides a last-dollar grant of up to $5,000 a
year, not to exceed the cost of attendance, and not to exceed $10,000 total for any student, to students who:
(i) have participated or are participating in a grow your own grant program, as described in
subsection (3)(a), while in high school and have earned at least 6 postsecondary credits toward an education
degree or are living in a community with a school impacted by a quality educator shortage;
(ii) are currently enrolled in a teacher preparation program in a licensure or endorsement area
identified as most impacted by quality educator shortages; and
(iii) commit to teaching in a school impacted by a quality educator shortage; and
(iv) if participation in a grow your own grant program occurred solely during high school, earned at
least 6 postsecondary credits toward an education degree.
(4) The commissioner shall convert a grant under subsection (3)(c) to a loan if the recipient of the
grant:
(i) is not licensed in a licensure or endorsement area identified as most impacted by quality
educator shortages within 5 years of receiving a grant; or
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 499
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 499
(ii) does not teach for 3 or more years in a school impacted by a quality educator shortage and in
a licensure or endorsement area identified as most impacted by quality educator shortages within 10 years of
receiving a grant.
(5)(4) The legislature intends that grants made to school districts and postsecondary institutions
pursuant to subsections (3)(a) and (3)(b) subsection (3)(a) are one-time startup grants that include:
(a) a matching component provided by the either a participating school district or the
postsecondary institution; and
(b) a plan by the school district or postsecondary institution to sustain programs beyond the term of
the grant.
(6)(5) In accordance with 5-11-210, the commissioner shall report annually to the education interim
committee on the status and impacts of the grant programs described in this section. The report must include:
(a) the number of students currently participating in a grow your own grant program;
(b) the number of former participants who hold a Montana teacher certificate; and
(c) the number of former participants who are teaching in the district where they participated in the
grow your own grant program.
(7)(6) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Postsecondary institution" means a unit of the Montana university system or a tribal college or
community college located in the state.
(b) "quality Quality educator shortage" means a shortage identified by the board of public
education pursuant to 20-4-503. (Terminates June 30, 2027--sec. 6, Ch. 514, L. 2021 2029.)"
Section 2. Section 6, Chapter 514, Laws of 2021, is amended to read:
"Section 6. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2027 2029."
Section 3. Appropriation. (1) There is appropriated $500,000 from the general fund to the
commissioner of higher education for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purposes of [section 1].
(2) The legislature intends that the appropriation in this section be considered part of the ongoing
base for the next legislative session.
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 499
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 499
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 499
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 499, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 499
INTRODUCED BY T. CROWE, S. NOVAK, B. EDWARDS, S. FYANT, J. WEBER, D. BEDEY, L. JONES, T.
RUNNING WOLF, F. SMITH, R. TEMPEL, M. FOX, G. LAMMERS, L. SMITH, J. WINDY BOY, E. BOLDMAN,
J. COHENOUR, D. HAWK, D. HAYMAN, C. KEOGH, E. KERR-CARPENTER, S. MORIGEAU, M. ROMANO,
E. STAFMAN, M. THANE, P. TUSS, C. FITZPATRICK, J. LYNCH
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING THE GROW YOUR OWN GRANT PROGRAM; PROVIDING THAT
POSTSECONDARY INSTITUTIONS ARE ELIGIBLE FOR GRANTS UNDER THE PROGRAM; REVISING THE
REQUIREMENT FOR EARNING POSTSECONDARY CREDITS WHILE IN HIGH SCHOOL; REMOVING THE
REQUIREMENT FOR THE COMMISSIONER OF HIGHER EDUCATION TO CONVERT A GRANT TO A LOAN
IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES; EXTENDING THE TERMINATION DATE FOR THE GROW YOUR OWN
GRANT PROGRAM; PROVIDING A DEFINITION; PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION; AMENDING SECTION
20-4-601, MCA; AMENDING SECTION 6, CHAPTER 514, LAWS OF 2021; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE
DATE.